Montana, session 2025, HB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-6-214, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-214. Unlawful contest or prize. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b) through (1)(d),
a person, firm, or club may not offer or give a prize, gift, or anything of value in connection with or as a bag limit
prize for the taking, capturing, killing, or in any manner acquiring any game, fowl, or fur-bearing animal or any
bird or animal protected by law.
(b) A prize may be awarded for any one game bird or fur-bearing animal on the basis of size,
quality, or rarity.
(c) A person may conduct or sponsor a contest for which the monetary prize, certificate, or award
does not exceed $50 for a person who kills a game animal possessing the largest antlers or horns, carrying the
greatest weight, or having the longest body or any similar contest based upon on the size or weight of a game
animal or part of a game animal. The monetary restriction provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to
recognition given by a nationally established and recognized Boone and Crockett trophy institute.
(d) Reimbursements for receipts of costs incurred related to the hunting or trapping of wolves may
be given to persons licensed to hunt or trap wolves who lawfully harvest wolves pursuant to Title 87, chapter
chapters 1 and 2.
(2) A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be fined not less than $50 or more than
$1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the
person, upon on conviction or forfeiture of bond or bail, may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 219
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 219
fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state or to use state
lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational purposes for a period of time set by the court."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 219
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 219, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 219
INTRODUCED BY L. SCHUBERT, E. ALBUS, K. LOVE, C. SCHOMER, C. HINKLE, B. LER, J. SCHILLINGER,
L. DEMING, L. BREWSTER, P. FIELDER, J. TREBAS, J. HINKLE
AN ACT PERMITTING REIMBURSEMENTS TO ALL INDIVIDUALS FOR RECEIPTS OF COSTS INCURRED
RELATED TO THE HUNTING OR TRAPPING OF WOLVES FOR ALL LAWFULLY HARVESTED WOLVES;
AND AMENDING SECTION 87-6-214, MCA.”